Utah statutes.
72-7-204.   Issuance of licenses -- Fees -- Duration -- Renewal -- Disposition of proceeds.

(1)  The department has the sole authority to issue licenses for the establishment, maintenance, and operation of junkyards within the limits defined in Section 72-7-203, and shall charge a $10 license fee payable annually in advance.

(2)  All licenses issued under this section expire on the first day of January following the date of issue.  Licenses may be renewed from year to year upon payment of the requisite fee.

(3)  Proceeds from the license fee shall be deposited with the state treasurer and credited to the Transportation Fund.

